public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
aƚastar/A
alienar/A
amarexar/A
angaređar/A
arđerar/A
dexarmiđar/A
inasprir/A
inaŧidir/A
axear/A
xbafarar/A
bakar/A
xbaƚar/A
inbalinar/A
balsamar/A
dexbandir/A
xbaporar/A
inbarbajar/A
xbarosar/A
bateđar/A
xbatoƚar/A
xbavaŧar/A
xbefexar/A
xberlefar/A
beverar/A
biankixar/A
xbilansar/A
biondiđar/A
inbixakar/A
rebójer/A
bokiđar/A
inbolsir/A
inbonbegar/A
bordelar/A
xboskar/A
aboŧar/A
brakiđar/A
bramegar/A
brasolar/A
inbriagar/A
xbrodolar/A
inbronbar/A
bruskar/A
xbufonar/A
butar/A
cakolar/A
scausar/A
inkoncèñer/A
cetar/A
incodar/A
benedir/A
danexar/A
indeñar/A
diaƚogar/A
maledíxer/A
indolentrar/A
domestegar/A
indormir/A
xdreƚar/A
kondúxer/A
xaltronar/A
inxenocar/A
xónxer/A
adornar/A
xugatolar/A
ebraidar/A
reelèxer/A
riesir/A
exasperar/A
likuefar/A
faeƚar/A
sfalŧar/A
fanfuñar/A
fataliđar/A
favelar/A
notifegar/A
defenir/A
referir/A
dexfetar/A
fiapir/A
infierir/A
trafilar/A
sfiokar/A
prefisar/A
reflèter/A
infoibar/A
fónder/A
desformar/A
fornegar/A
infradelar/A
infrànđer/A
sfratar/A
sfredir/A
desfríxer/A
frontar/A
sfugasar/A
infuriar/A
dexgaɉar/A
galixar/A
ingameƚar/A
xgañoƚir/A
ingarbujar/A
ingatejar/A
xgiñaŧar/A
xgonbrar/A
ingoŧar/A
ingranir/A
granxir/A
agravar/A
xgremir/A
xgrinfar/A
xgriŧar/A
xgrongoƚar/A
xguanŧar/A
guastar/A
dexgustar/A
indateɉar/A
inɉuriar/A
insular/A
inŧitar/A
exíɉer/A
dexjaŧar/A
jeƚar/A
xjinsar/A
xɉosar/A
jugular/A
inkadenar/A
kalar/A
kalkar/A
inkaƚotir/A
skalumar/A
kanedar/A
kanopar/A
kantusar/A
deskapitar/A
skapuŧar/A
deskargar/A
karpir/A
inkartonar/A
kastronar/A
katekidar/A
prokaŧar/A
skavaleŧar/A
inkaxonar/A
kogoƚar/A
kokonar/A
deskolorir/A
skomensar/A
koncar/A
konpañar/A
kontexar/A
skonŧar/A
okórer/A
akòrder/A
korniđar/A
skortegar/A
kosar/A
skovèrder/A
kréser/A
krivelar/A
inkrostolar/A
kuadrar/A
kuentar/A
skufonar/A
skulaŧar/A
skursar/A
ƚakonixar/A
ƚanpar/A
ƚapiar/A
latar/A
xlavasar/A
ƚekar/A
xlenguasar/A
arlevar/A
deliberar/A
ƚikar/A
sotoƚinear/A
ƚitigar/A
dexlojar/A
xloŧar/A
inluminar/A
xlúxer/A
xmaɉar/A
mamalukar/A
manexar/A
mañatar/A
mareɉar/A
martiridar/A
xmaserar/A
xmatidar/A
masipar/A
framedar/A
meɉorar/A
mentir/A
remeritar/A
manométer/A
miɉorar/A
dexmisiar/A
mojar/A
xmoƚar/A
mónđer/A
moraƚixar/A
morsar/A
moteđar/A
mudarar/A
dexmurar/A
muŧar/A
inaspar/A
negriđar/A
ninar/A
noƚexar/A
dexnoxelar/A
ñaoƚar/A
ocedar/A
okelar/A
onbridar/A
onorar/A
ordar/A
abortir/A
inpacar/A
padroniđar/A
despaketar/A
paleŧar/A
palpedar/A
spànder/A
pansar/A
inparar/A
paridar/A
partikolarixar/A
paskolar/A
pastrocar/A
inpatriarkar/A
spavejar/A
strapegar/A
spelacar/A
speƚumar/A
depénxer/A
despensar/A
pèrder/A
personaƚixar/A
petedar/A
despetrir/A
piadeđar/A
pianxotar/A
repiegar/A
pincar/A
piovexinar/A
pistoƚetar/A
pisolar/A
konplikar/A
polsar/A
apóner/A
supóner/A
pontelar/A
strapónxer/A
straportar/A
spotacar/A
predegar/A
spresar/A
prinsipiar/A
aprovar/A
espuñar/A
putaniđar/A
rabotar/A
skorajar/A
ranđar/A
skoraŧar/A
reciđar/A
regalixar/A
renunŧiar/A
ríder/A
riŧolar/A
ròder/A
irokar/A
ronkir/A
inrosir/A
rovinar/A
rugar/A
rusar/A
skonsagrar/A
desaƚir/A
salixar/A
sangonar/A
sartorar/A
scafidar/A
scopetar/A
sekolariđar/A
insèguer/A
deskonsejar/A
inselvadegir/A
akonsentir/A
deseparar/A
sestar/A
siar/A
desijilar/A
singolaridar/A
skakañar/A
skandaƚixar/A
deskarselar/A
iskeƚetrar/A
skiŧar/A
deskorsar/A
skríver/A
insoasar/A
solajar/A
solkar/A
insonolir/A
sortir/A
spaƚankar/A
ispaxemar/A
sperimentar/A
spiansar/A
respirar/A
insporkar/A
konstar/A
staƚar/A
stanpar/A
istekir/A
stiƚar/A
stiŧar/A
destokoƚar/A
stranbar/A
restrénđer/A
destropar/A
stubiar/A
strasuar/A
insultar/A
insustar/A
taɉar/A
atakar/A
tanburar/A
tastar/A
tèmer/A
atentar/A
sostèñer/A
destèser/A
intixikir/A
sintoniđar/A
tòrđer/A
retràer/A
trapoƚar/A
istremir/A
triveƚar/A
turbiar/A
saratanar/A
ŧenɉar/A
deŧernir/A
resíder/A
reŧiñar/A
ŧokolar/A
ujar/A
vagar/A
vanŧar/A
sorveɉar/A
xventar/A
intravèñer/A
xvergoƚar/A
vesar/A
inviƚanir/A
visinar/A
malvoler/A
revòlxer/A
xbringar/A
xirandolar/A
xoƚar/A
intensifegar/A
deríder/A
pernotar/A
koratar/A
intorsar/A
sarir/A
xgrandar/A
đeneraliđar/A
